Tennessee statutes. Title 45 Banks And Financial Institutions
Chapter 20 Tennessee Home Loan Protection Act
45-20-110. Restrictions on local regulation.

All counties, municipalities, or political subdivisions of this state are prohibited from enacting and enforcing ordinances, resolutions, and rules regulating financial and lending activities, including ordinances, resolutions, and rules disqualifying persons from doing business with a city, county, or municipality based upon lending practices, interest rates or imposing reporting requirements or any other obligations upon persons regarding financial services or lending practices of persons or entities, and any subsidiaries or affiliates thereof, who:

Are subject to the jurisdiction of the department of financial institutions, including activities subject to this chapter;

Are subject to the jurisdiction of the office of thrift supervision, the office of the comptroller of the currency, the national credit union administration, the federal deposit insurance corporation, the federal trade commission, or the United States department of housing and urban development;

Originate, purchase, sell, buy, secure, or service property interests or obligations created by financial transactions or loans made, executed, or originated by persons referred to in subdivision (1) or (2) to assist or facilitate the transactions; or

Are chartered by the United States congress to engage in secondary market mortgage transactions.

Acts 2006, ch. 801, § 12.

45-20-111. Application.

This chapter shall apply to all high-cost home loans applied for and closed on or after January 1, 2007; provided, that this chapter shall not apply to the extent it is preempted by, or is in conflict with or inconsistent with the National Bank Act (12 U.S.C. § 21 et seq.), the Homeowner's Loan Act (12 U.S.C. § 1464 et seq.), the Federal Credit Union Act (12 U.S.C. § 1751 et seq.), or regulations issued by the office of the comptroller of the currency, the office of thrift supervision, the federal deposit insurance corporation or the federal credit union administration, and as interpreted by the federal courts, to national or state banks or trust companies, federal or state savings institutions, federal or state credit unions, or the operating subsidiaries of any of those.

Acts 2006, ch. 801, § 13.